Florida, session 2026, SB1564.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 65 66 Section 1.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1) of 67 section 550.01215, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 68 550.01215âLicense application; periods of operation; 69 license fees; bond.â 70 (1)âEach permitholder shall annually, during the period 71 between January 15 and February 4, file in writing with the 72 commission its application for an operating license for a pari 73 mutuel facility for the conduct of pari-mutuel wagering during 74 the next state fiscal year, including intertrack and simulcast 75 race wagering. Each application for live performances must 76 specify the number, dates, and starting times of all live 77 performances that the permitholder intends to conduct. It must 78 also specify which performances will be conducted as charity or 79 scholarship performances. 80 (a)âEach application for an operating license also must 81 include: 82 1.âFor each permitholder, whether the permitholder intends 83 to accept wagers on intertrack or simulcast events. 84 2.âFor each permitholder that elects to operate a cardroom, 85 the dates and periods of operation the permitholder intends to 86 operate the cardroom. 87 3.âFor each thoroughbred racing permitholder that elects to 88 receive or rebroadcast out-of-state races, the dates for all 89 performances that the permitholder intends to conduct. 90 (b)1.âA greyhound permitholder may not conduct live racing. 91 A jai alai permitholder, harness horse racing permitholder, 92 thoroughbred permitholder, or quarter horse racing permitholder 93 may elect not to conduct live racing or games. A thoroughbred 94 permitholder must conduct live racing. A greyhound permitholder, 95 jai alai permitholder, harness horse racing permitholder, or 96 quarter horse racing permitholder, or thoroughbred permitholder 97 that does not conduct live racing or games retains its permit; 98 is a pari-mutuel facility as defined in s. 550.002(23); if such 99 permitholder has been issued a slot machine license, the 100 facility where such permit is located remains an eligible 101 facility as defined in s. 551.102(4), continues to be eligible 102 for a slot machine license pursuant to s. 551.104(3), and is 103 exempt from ss. 551.104(4)(c) and (10) and 551.114(2); is 104 eligible, but not required, to be a guest track and, if the 105 permitholder is a harness horse racing permitholder, to be a 106 host track for purposes of intertrack wagering and simulcasting 107 pursuant to ss. 550.3551, 550.615, 550.625, and 550.6305; and 108 remains eligible for a cardroom license, and is exempt from s. 109 849.086(5)(c) and (13)(d)2. A thoroughbred permitholder that 110 operates a slot machine facility or cardroom must offer a full 111 schedule of live racing until such permitholder notifies the 112 commission that it will no longer offer live racing. Notice 113 under this paragraph is not valid unless delivered to the 114 commission on or after July 1, 2027. Such notice must contain 115 the date on which the permitholder will no longer offer live 116 racing, which may be no earlier than a date 3 years after the 117 date of the notice. A permitholder is not required to deliver 118 such notice when relocating pursuant to s. 550.3345(2)(d) or s. 119 550.475 with authorization by the commission in accordance with 120 s. 550.054. 121 2.âA permitholder or licensee may not conduct live 122 greyhound racing or dogracing in connection with any wager for 123 money or any other thing of value in the state. The commission 124 may deny, suspend, or revoke any permit or license under this 125 chapter if a permitholder or licensee conducts live greyhound 126 racing or dogracing in violation of this subparagraph. In 127 addition to, or in lieu of, denial, suspension, or revocation of 128 such permit or license, the commission may impose a civil 129 penalty of up to $5,000 against the permitholder or licensee for 130 a violation of this subparagraph. All penalties imposed and 131 collected must be deposited with the Chief Financial Officer to 132 the credit of the General Revenue Fund. 133 Section 2.âSubsection (13) and paragraph (b) of subsection 134 (14) of section 550.054, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 135 550.054âApplication for permit to conduct pari-mutuel 136 wagering.â 137 (13)(a)âNotwithstanding any provisions of this chapter to 138 the contrary, a no thoroughbred horse racing permit or license 139 issued under this chapter may shall be transferred, or reissued 140 when such reissuance is in the nature of a transfer so as to 141 permit or authorize a licensee to change the location of a 142 thoroughbred horse racetrack except upon authorization by proof 143 in such form as the commission may prescribe that a referendum 144 election has been held: 145 1.âIf the proposed new location is within the same county 146 as the already licensed location, in the county where the 147 licensee desires to conduct the race meeting and that a majority 148 of the electors voting on that question in such election voted 149 in favor of the transfer of such license. 150 2.âIf the proposed new location is not within the same 151 county as the already licensed location, in the county where the 152 licensee desires to conduct the race meeting and in the county 153 where the licensee is already licensed to conduct the race 154 meeting and that a majority of the electors voting on that 155 question in each such election voted in favor of the transfer of 156 such license. 157 (b)âEach referendum held under the provisions of this 158 subsection shall be held in accordance with the electoral 159 procedures for ratification of permits, as provided in s. 160 550.0651. The expense of each such referendum shall be borne by 161 the licensee requesting the transfer. 162 (14) 163 (b)âThe commission, upon application from the holder of a 164 jai alai permit meeting all conditions of this section, shall 165 convert the permit and shall issue to the permitholder a permit 166 to conduct greyhound racing. A permitholder of a permit 167 converted under this section is shall be required to apply for 168 and conduct a full schedule of live racing each fiscal year to 169 be eligible for any tax credit provided by this chapter. The 170 holder of a permit converted pursuant to this subsection or any 171 holder of a permit to conduct greyhound racing located in a 172 county in which it is the only permit issued pursuant to this 173 section who operates at a leased facility pursuant to s. 550.475 174 may move the location for which the permit has been issued to 175 another location within a 30-mile radius of the location fixed 176 in the permit issued in that county, provided the move does not 177 cross the county boundary and such location is approved under 178 the zoning regulations of the county or municipality in which 179 the permit is located, and upon such relocation may use the 180 permit for the conduct of pari-mutuel wagering and the operation 181 of a cardroom. The provisions of s. 550.6305(9)(d) and (f) shall 182 apply to any permit converted under this subsection and shall 183 continue to apply to any permit which was previously included 184 under and subject to such provisions before a conversion 185 pursuant to this section occurred. 186 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 187 550.09515, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 188 550.09515âThoroughbred horse taxes; abandoned interest in a 189 permit for nonpayment of taxes.â 190 (3)(a)âThe permit of a thoroughbred horse permitholder who 191 conducts live thoroughbred performances and does not pay tax on 192 handle for live thoroughbred horse performances for a full 193 schedule of live races during any 2 consecutive state fiscal 194 years is shall be void and must shall escheat to and become the 195 property of the state unless such failure to operate and pay tax 196 on handle was the direct result of fire, strike, war, or other 197 disaster or event beyond the ability of the permitholder to 198 control. Financial hardship to the permitholder does shall not, 199 in and of itself, constitute just cause for failure to operate 200 and pay tax on handle. 201 Section 4.âSubsection (2) of section 550.3345, Florida 202 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (3) of that section is 203 reenacted, to read: 204 550.3345âConversion of quarter horse permit to a limited 205 thoroughbred permit.â 206 (2)âNotwithstanding any other provision of law, the holder 207 of a quarter horse racing permit issued under s. 550.334 may, 208 within 1 year after the effective date of this section, apply to 209 the commission for a transfer of the quarter horse racing permit 210 to a not-for-profit corporation formed under state law to serve 211 the purposes of the state as provided in subsection (1). The 212 board of directors of the not-for-profit corporation shall 213 consist must be comprised of 11 members, 4 of whom shall be 214 designated by the applicant, 4 of whom shall be designated by 215 the commission Florida Thoroughbred Breedersâ Association, and 3 216 of whom shall be designated by the other 8 directors, with at 217 least 1 of these 3 members being an authorized representative of 218 another thoroughbred permitholder in this state. The not-for 219 profit corporation shall submit an application to the commission 220 for review and approval of the transfer in accordance with s. 221 550.054. Upon approval of the transfer by the commission, and 222 notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the 223 not-for-profit corporation may, within 1 year after its receipt 224 of the permit, request that the commission convert the quarter 225 horse racing permit to a permit authorizing the holder to 226 conduct pari-mutuel wagering meets of thoroughbred racing. 227 Neither The transfer of the quarter horse racing permit or nor 228 its conversion to a limited thoroughbred permit may not shall be 229 subject to the mileage limitation or the ratification election 230 as set forth under s. 550.054(2) or s. 550.0651. Upon receipt of 231 the request for such conversion, the commission shall timely 232 issue a converted permit. The converted permit and the not-for 233 profit corporation is shall be subject to the following 234 requirements: 235 (a)âAll net revenues derived by the not-for-profit 236 corporation under the thoroughbred horse racing permit and any 237 license issued to the not-for-profit corporation under chapter 238 849, after the funding of operating expenses and capital 239 improvements, must shall be dedicated to the enhancement of 240 thoroughbred purses and breedersâ, stallion, and special racing 241 awards under this chapter; the general promotion of the 242 thoroughbred horse breeding industry; and the care in this state 243 of thoroughbred horses retired from racing. 244 (b)âFrom December 1 through April 30, no live thoroughbred 245 racing may not be conducted under the permit on any day during 246 which another thoroughbred permitholder is conducting live 247 thoroughbred racing within 125 air miles of the not-for-profit 248 corporationâs pari-mutuel facility unless the other thoroughbred 249 permitholder gives its written consent. 250 (c)âAfter the conversion of the quarter horse racing permit 251 and the issuance of its initial license to conduct pari-mutuel 252 wagering meets of thoroughbred racing, the not-for-profit 253 corporation shall annually apply to the commission for a license 254 pursuant to s. 550.5251. 255 (d)âRacing under the permit may take place only at the 256 location for which the original quarter horse racing permit was 257 issued, which may be leased by the not-for-profit corporation 258 for that purpose; however, the not-for-profit corporation may, 259 without the conduct of any ratification election pursuant to s. 260 550.054(13) or s. 550.0651, move the location of the permit to 261 another location in the same county, or a location in a 262 different county which has been previously authorized for pari 263 mutuel wagering, provided that such relocation is approved under 264 the zoning and land use regulations of the applicable county or 265 municipality. 266 (e)âA permit converted under this section and a license 267 issued to the not-for-profit corporation under chapter 849 are 268 not eligible for transfer to another person or entity. 269 (3)âUnless otherwise provided in this section, after 270 conversion, the permit and the not-for-profit corporation shall 271 be treated under the laws of this state as a thoroughbred permit 272 and as a thoroughbred permitholder, respectively, with the 273 exception of ss. 550.09515(3) and 550.6308. 274 Section 5.âSection 550.475, Florida Statutes, is amended to 275 read: 276 550.475âLease of pari-mutuel facilities by pari-mutuel 277 permitholders.âHolders of valid pari-mutuel permits for the 278 conduct of any pari-mutuel wagering in this state may are 279 entitled to lease any and all of the their facilities of to any 280 other holder of a same class valid pari-mutuel permit or a 281 thoroughbred training facility holding a valid license issued by 282 the commission, when located within a 50-mile 35-mile radius of 283 each other; and such lessee is entitled to a permit and license 284 to conduct intertrack wagering and operate its race meet or jai 285 alai games at the leased premises. A thoroughbred permitholder 286 relocation pursuant to s. 550.3345(2)(d) or this section, in 287 accordance with s. 550.054, may not operate a cardroom at a 288 leased training facility. Notwithstanding any other law, the 289 lessor of a pari-mutuel facility that has been issued a slot 290 machine license or a cardroom license is an eligible facility as 291 defined in s. 551.102. 292 Section 6.âSubsection (1) of section 550.5251, Florida 293 Statutes, is amended to read: 294 550.5251âFlorida thoroughbred racing; certain permits; 295 operating days.â 296 (1)âEach thoroughbred permitholder required to offer live 297 racing must shall annually, during the period commencing January 298 15 of each year and ending February 4 of the following year, 299 file in writing with the commission its application to conduct 300 one or more thoroughbred racing meetings during the thoroughbred 301 racing season commencing on the following July 1. Each 302 application must shall specify the number and dates of all 303 performances that the permitholder intends to conduct during 304 that thoroughbred racing season. On or before April 15 of each 305 year, the commission shall issue a license authorizing each 306 permitholder to conduct performances on the dates specified in 307 its application. Up to March 28 of each year, each permitholder 308 may request and shall be granted changes in its application to 309 conduct performances; but thereafter, as a condition precedent 310 to the validity of its license and its right to retain its 311 permit, each permitholder must operate the full number of days 312 authorized on each of the dates set forth in its license. 313 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 314 made by this act to sections 550.01215 and 550.475, Florida 315 Statutes, in references thereto, subsections (2) and (8) of 316 section 550.615, Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 317 550.615âIntertrack wagering.â 318 (2)âExcept as provided in subsection (1), a pari-mutuel 319 permitholder that has met the applicable requirement for that 320 permitholder to conduct live racing or games under s. 321 550.01215(1)(b), if any, for fiscal year 2020-2021 is qualified 322 to, at any time, receive broadcasts of any class of pari-mutuel 323 race or game and accept wagers on such races or games conducted 324 by any class of permitholders licensed under this chapter. 325 (8)âIn any three contiguous counties of the state where 326 there are only three permitholders, all of which are greyhound 327 permitholders, if any permitholder leases the facility of 328 another permitholder for all or any portion of the conduct of 329 its live race meet pursuant to s. 550.475, such lessee may 330 conduct intertrack wagering at its pre-lease permitted facility 331 throughout the entire year. 332 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.